Florida, session 2026, HB1439.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 17.326, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
17.326 Local government spending analysis.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "local government
spending analysis" means a statement prepared by the department,
or an agency thereof, analyzing the spending of a county
government.
(2) If a local government spending analysis has been
prepared, such analysis must be included on any referendum
proposing an increase in taxes levied by a county.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this
section, including standards and requirements for a local
government spending analysis.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1439-00